Wisconsin, session 2025, SB369.
do enact as follows:SB369,11Section 1. 20.934 of the statutes is created to read:SB369,2,3220.934 Prohibiting certain data sharing. (1) Definitions. In this 3section:SB369,2,64(a) “Personally identifiable information” means information that can be 5associated with a particular individual through one or more identifiers or other 6information or circumstances.SB369,2,107(b) “State agency” means an association, authority, board, department, 8commission, independent agency, institution, office, or other body in state 9government created or authorized to be created by the constitution or any law, 10including the legislature and the courts.SB369,2,1311(2) Prohibited data sharing. (a) Except as provided in par. (b), no state 12agency may share with any federal official or agency data containing personally 13identifiable information unless the data is first masked or otherwise anonymized.SB369,2,1614(b) 1. A state agency may share unmasked data with federal officials or 15agencies to the extent necessary to comply with other state law or federal law or to 16carry out the administration of a state or federal program.SB369,2,19172. A member of the legislature may share unmasked data with federal 18officials or agencies to the extent necessary to carry out constituent relations or the 19member’s other official duties.SB369,3,213. A court may share unmasked data with federal officials or agencies to the 2extent necessary to carry out the court’s official duties.SB369,3,63(3) Actions for violations. Any person who negligently violates sub. (2) 4shall be liable to any person injured as a result of the violation for actual damages 5to that person, exemplary damages of not more than $1,000, and costs and 6reasonable actual attorney fees.SB369,3,77